Hawaii statutes.
§171-98 Release of restrictions. It
being in the public interest, all public land for which any certificate, lease,
agreement, or patent has heretofore been issued imposing restrictions against
alienation and forfeiture provisions prescribed by Public Law 192, 61st
Congress, 2d Session, 36 Statutes at Large 444 (1910), and Public Law 234, 76th
Congress, 1st Session, 53 Statutes at Large 1126 (1939), (section 73(g) and
73(h) of the Hawaiian Organic Act), be and the same is hereby wholly released
from such restrictions and provisions; provided nothing herein contained shall
be construed to defeat or in any way impair the interest of any mortgagee or
holder of record having a security interest or owner of vested rights in and to
the public land affected by the release aforesaid. Though no form of
documentation shall be required to effect the release provided by this section,
the board of land and natural resources is authorized to issue to any owner of
the land affected by the release, upon payment of such documentary fees as may
be provided by the board, an appropriate certificate of release suitable for
recording. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-92; HRS §171-98]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next